Arkansas, session 2025, SB327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-171-215(a)(5), concerning payments to
the Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show Association for state assistance
to cities and counties, is amended to read as follows:
(5) The Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show Association or
its bond trustee shall receive the moneys listed in this subdivision (a)(5),
less any general revenues appropriated to the Arkansas State Fair and
Livestock Show:
(A) Seven hundred ten thousand three hundred twenty-eight
dollars ($710,328) in the fiscal year 2009 Eight hundred eighty-seven
thousand nine hundred eight dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2025;
(B) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2010 2026;
(C) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2011 2027;
(D) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2012 2028;
(E) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2013 2029;
*SSS201*
02/26/2025 4:14:14 PM SSS201

SB327
(F) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2014 2030;
(G) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2015 2031;
(H) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2016 2032;
(I) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2017 2033;
(J) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2018 2034; and
(K) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2019 2035;
(L) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2020;
(M) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2021;
(N) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2022;
(O) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2023;
(P) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2024; and
(Q) Eight hundred eighty-seven thousand nine hundred eight
dollars ($887,908) in the fiscal year 2025.












02/26/2025 4:14:14 PM SSS201